Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.021

Policy.

It is the policy of the state of Washington that all commissioned, appointed, and elected law enforcement personnel comply with their oath of office and agency policies regarding the duty to be truthful and honest in the conduct of their official business.

[ 2010 c 294 s 1.]